Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 13.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1914
Commission; awards; duties.

(1) Within thirty days after receiving recommendations pursuant to section
85-1913, the commission shall review the recommended awards for compliance
with the Nebraska Opportunity Grant Act and
its rules and regulations and notify each eligible postsecondary educational
institution of the approval or disapproval of recommended awards.

(2) The commission shall distribute to each eligible postsecondary educational
institution the total award amount approved for eligible students at such
institution. The eligible postsecondary educational institution shall act
as an agent of the commission to disburse the awards directly to eligible
students during the award year.

Laws 2003, LB 574, § 14;

Laws 2010, LB956, § 13.